Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7283.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 33-9-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 33-9 entitled "Collection and
Management of Decedents’ Estates" is hereby amended to read as follows:
33-9-1. Return of inventory of estate.
(a) Every administrator and every executor, shall, within ninety (90) days after his or her
appointment or such longer period as may be allowed by the probate court, return to the probate
court, under oath, a true inventory of all the personal property, both tangible and intangible, and of
all claims, rights, causes of actions and other assets, other than real property, of the deceased, with
an appraisement thereof as of the date of the decedent’s death.
(b) Any administrator or executor, upon presentment of proof of appointment and personal
identification, shall have the authority to request, from any financial institution, all funds of the
decedent on deposit to be provided by the financial institution to the administrator or executor the
same day of the request, without incurring any additional fees.
(c) The department of business regulation shall have the authority to impose penalties for
violation of this section pursuant to § 19-14-26.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004271
========